Maryland, session 2025, HB1234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
2–126.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “ACCESSORY DWELLING UNIT” MEANS A SECONDARY DWELLING
UNIT ON THE SAME LOT, PARCEL, OR TRACT AS A PRIMARY DWELLING UNIT THAT IS
CONSTRUCTED:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1234*

HOUSE BILL 1234
(I) ATTACHED TO, OR THROUGH THE CONVERSION OF, A
PORTION OF THE PRIMARY DWELLING UNIT;
(II) ATTACHED TO, OR THROUGH THE FULL OR PARTIAL
CONVERSION OF, AN ACCESSORY STRUCTURE LOCATED ON THE SAME LOT, PARCEL,
OR TRACT AS THE PRIMARY DWELLING UNIT; OR
(III) AS A NEW BUILDING, DETACHED FROM THE PRIMARY
DWELLING UNIT AND ANY EXISTING ACCESSORY STRUCTURE.
(3) “RESTRICTION ON USE” MEANS ANY COVENANT, RESTRICTION,
OR CONDITION CONTAINED IN:
(I) A DEED;
(II) A DECLARATION; OR
(III) THE BYLAWS OR RULES OF A HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN MONTGOMERY COUNTY.
(C) A RESTRICTION ON USE THAT PROHIBITS THE USE OF REAL PROPERTY
FOR ACCESSORY DWELLING UNITS OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED UNDER LAW IS VOID
AND UNENFORCEABLE AS CONTRARY TO PUBLIC POLICY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply retroactively and shall be applied to and interpreted to affect any restriction on use
recorded before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.